West Virginia, session 2025, HB2438.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. STATE CONVICT ROAD FORCE. §17-5-1. State convict road force; how used. All male persons convicted of a felony and, sentenced to imprisonment or confinement in the penitentiary a correctional facility by any court, or who may hereafter be sentenced for a felony, whether actually sentenced to labor or not, or so many thereof as may be required by the state road Highways Commissioner, shall, as incident to such sentence or confinement, constitute the state convict road force and as such may be employed under the supervision of the state road Highways Commissioner in building, surfacing and maintaining roads under the supervision of the state road Highways Commissioner, including all roads in the state road system, and in and about any quarries, gravel pits, sandbanks, crushers, brick kilns, or other plants and places operated by the state road commission Division of Highways for the manufacture and acquisition of materials for use in the construction, maintenance and repair of such roads.